apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lt</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lt</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ight</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ight</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ights</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghts</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>own</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ids</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ade</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idden</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/go_nul__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>goes</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>went</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gone</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="as PRN go along" a="eleka" r="LR">
       <i>as<b/></i>
       <par n="prsubj_nul__prn"/>
       <i><b/></i>
       <par n="/go_nul__vblex"/>
       <i><b/>along</i>
       <par n="after__cnjadv"/>
     </e>
	<e lm="feel dizzy" a="eleka"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>dizzy</l><r><g><b/>dizzy</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="feel unfriendly" a="eleka"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>unfriendly</l><r><g><b/>unfriendly</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="as PRN go along" r="LR">
      <i>as<b/></i>
      <par n="prsubj_nul__prn"/>
      <i><b/></i>
      <par n="/go_nul__vblex"/>
      <i><b/>along</i>
      <par n="after__cnjadv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="fight"><i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="feel"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fly"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flee"><i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="forbid"><i>forb</i><par n="forb/id__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="light"><i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/>    </e>
